test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-koonjal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - koonjâl: # 2B
    koonjâl+N+Sg+Nom: koonjâl
    koonjâl+N+Sg+Gen: koonnjâl
    koonjâl+N+Sg+Acc: koonnjâl
    koonjâl+N+Sg+Ill: konjâlân
    koonjâl+N+Sg+Loc: konjâlist
    koonjâl+N+Sg+Com: konjâláin
    koonjâl+N+Sg+Abe: koonnjâlttáá
    koonjâl+N+Ess:    konjâlin
    koonjâl+N+Par:    konjâlid
    koonjâl+N+Pl+Nom: konjâleh
    koonjâl+N+Pl+Gen: konjâlij
    koonjâl+N+Pl+Acc: konjâlijd
    koonjâl+N+Pl+Ill: konjâláid
    koonjâl+N+Pl+Loc: konjâlijn
    koonjâl+N+Pl+Com: konjâlijguin
    koonjâl+N+Pl+Abe: konjâlijttáá
